Wyoming, session 2026, HB0100.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 17-19-701(c) and 17-19-702(d) are
amended to read:

17-19-701. Annual and regular meetings.

(c) Annual and regular membership meetings may be
held in or out of this state at the place stated in or
fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated
in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual and
HB0100

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0155
regular meetings shall be held at the corporation's
principal office. Unless the articles or bylaws provide
otherwise, any or all members may participate in an annual
or regular meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the
use of, any means of communication by which all members
participating may simultaneously communicate with each
other during the meeting. A member participating in a
meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at
the meeting.

17-19-702. Special meeting.

(d) Special meetings of members may be held in or out
of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance
with the bylaws. If no place is stated or fixed in
accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held
at the corporation's principal office. Unless the articles
or bylaws provide otherwise, any or all members may
participate in a special meeting by, or conduct the meeting
through the use of, any means of communication by which all
members participating may simultaneously communicate with
each other during the meeting. A member participating in a
HB0100

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0155
meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at
the meeting.

Section 2. This act shall apply to membership
meetings of nonprofit corporations occurring on and after
July 1, 2026.

Section 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
have prevented or made improper the conduct of membership
meetings of nonprofit corporations where members
participated by using any means of communication by which
the members simultaneously communicated with each other
that occurred before the effective date of this act.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0100